Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 5. Penalties and Enforcement

§ 37-8-501.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-701

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning enforcement of specific crimes and penalties, see §

31-18-701

.

§§ 37-8-502 through 37-8-507.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

See note catchlined “Revision of chapter” at beginning of chapter.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, §§ 43 to 47; Laws 1937, ch. 121, § 24; Laws 1959, ch. 117, § 1, related to hearings.

§§ 37-8-508 through 37-8-516.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 52, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to right of review, see §

37-2-130

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, §§ 47 to 55, related to appeals.

§§ 37-8-517 and 37-8-518.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

See note catchlined “Revision of chapter” at beginning of chapter.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, §§ 56, 57, related to criminal and civil enforcement of the public service commission's orders.